Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201679-4,128
County clerk; duties; filings required.

If the plan of reorganization is approved by the state committee pursuant to the Learning Community Reorganization Act, the county clerk shall proceed to cause the changes, realignment, and adjustment of districts to be carried out as provided in the plan. The county clerk shall classify the school districts according to the plan of reorganization. He or she shall also file certificates with the county assessor, county treasurer, learning community coordinating council, and state committee showing the boundaries of the various districts under the approved plan of reorganization.

Laws 2006, LB 1024, § 39;

Laws 2007, LB641, § 8;

Laws 2016, LB1067, § 27.
July 21, 2016